Washington statutes.
RCW 36.120.200

Regional transportation investment district account.

The regional transportation investment district account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The purpose of this account is to act as an account into which may be deposited state money, if any, that may be used in conjunction with district money to fund transportation projects. Additionally, the district may deposit funds into this account for disbursement, as appropriate, on transportation projects. Nothing in this section requires any state matching money. All money deposited in the regional transportation investment district account will be used for design, right-of-way acquisition, capital acquisition, and construction, or for the payment of debt service associated with these activities, for regionally funded transportation projects developed under this chapter. Only the district may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. An appropriation is not required for expenditures from this account.

[ 2002 c 56 s 401.]